Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.575

Renewable fuels accelerator account.

The renewable fuels accelerator account is created in the state treasury. Revenues to the account consist of appropriations made by the legislature, federal funds, gifts or grants from the private sector or foundations, and other sources deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for purposes designated in RCW 43.330.565 and 43.330.570 and section 201, chapter 292, Laws of 2022. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.

[ 2022 c 292 s 104.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 292 ss 104 and 201: "Sections 104 and 201 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately [March 31, 2022]." [ 2022 c 292 s 501.]

Findings—Intent—2022 c 292: See note following RCW 43.330.565.